Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-7912
Confidentiality; discovery; availability of medical records, documents, or information; limitation; burden of proof.

(1) The proceedings, records, minutes, and reports of a peer review committee shall be held in confidence and shall not be subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action. No person who attends a meeting of a peer review committee, works for or on behalf of a peer review committee, provides information to a peer review committee, or participates in a peer review activity as an officer, director, employee, or member of a professional health care service entity or an officer, director, employee, or member of the governing board of a facility which is a health care provider shall be permitted or required to testify in any such civil action as to any evidence or other matters produced or presented during the proceedings or activities of the peer review committee or as to any findings, recommendations, evaluations, opinions, or other actions of the peer review committee or any members thereof.

(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent discovery or use in any civil action of medical records, documents, or information otherwise available from original sources and kept with respect to any patient in the ordinary course of business, but the records, documents, or information shall be available only from the original sources and cannot be obtained from the peer review committee's proceedings or records.

(3) A health care provider or individual claiming the privileges under this section has the burden of proving that the communications and documents are protected.

Laws 2011, LB431, § 9;

Laws 2019, LB119, § 7.